Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-806
Documentation; requirements.

(1) All state agencies shall process and document all contracts through the state accounting system. The Director of Administrative Services shall specify the format and type of information for state agencies to provide and approve any alternatives to such formats. All state agencies shall enter the information on new contracts and amendments to existing contracts. State agency directors shall ensure that contracts are coded appropriately into the state accounting system.

(2) The requirements of this section also apply to the courts, the Legislature, and any officer or state agency established by the Constitution of Nebraska, but not to the University of Nebraska or the Nebraska state colleges.

(3) The Director of Administrative Services shall establish a centralized database, either through the state accounting system or through an alternative system, which specifically identifies where a copy of each contract may be found.

Laws 2003, LB 626, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB858, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 73-503;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 6.